Utah statutes.
31A-42a-103.   Applicability and scope.

This chapter applies:

(1)  to a carrier that offers a health benefit plan in a defined contribution arrangement under Chapter 30, Part 2, Defined Contribution Arrangements; and

(2)  any health benefit plan offered to a small employer group on or after January 1, 2011, including a plan offered to a small employer group not participating in a defined contribution arrangement.

